PERRONY pages/g2p.foma
# grapheme to phoneme

define V    [ a | e | i | o | u | y | é | ê | â | ô | œ | ä ] ;

define C    [ b | c | ç | d | f | g | h | j | k | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | z ] ;

define WB   [ .#. | " " ] ;

# -------------- CONSONANTS --------------

# 'pp' -> /p/
define PP           p p -> p ;

# 'bb' -> /b/
define BB           b b -> b ;

# 'tt' -> /t/
define TT           t t -> tː ;

# 'c' -> /s/ before i, e
define softC        c -> S || _ [ e | i | é ] ;

# 'c' -> /ʃ/ before i V 
define CI           c -> ʃ || _ i V ;

# 'c' -> /k/ elsewhere
define hardC        c -> k ;

# 'cc' -> /k/
define CC           c c -> k ;

# 'qu' -> /k/
define QU           q u -> k ;

# 'g' -> /ʒ/ before i, e
define softG        g -> ʒ || _ [ e | i | é ] ;

# 'gu' -> /g/ before i, e
define GU           g u -> g || _ [ e | i | é ] ;

# 'mm' -> /m/
define MM           m m -> m ;

# 'nn' -> /n/
define NN           n n -> N ;

# 'n' -> /n/ intervocalically
define intervocalN  n (->) N || V _ V ;
define fixN         N -> n ;

# 'ng' -> /ŋ/ word-finally
define finalNG      n g -> n ŋ || _ WB ;

# 'ng' -> /ŋg/ elsewhere
define regNG        n g -> n ŋ g ;

# 'nq' -> /ŋk/ 
define NQ           n q -> n ŋ k ;

# 'gn' -> /ɲ/
define GN           g n -> ɲ ;

# 'vv' -> /v/
define VV           v v -> v ;

# 's' -> /∅/ word-finally, and sometimes liaison
define finalS       s -> 0 || _ WB ;
define liaisonS     s (->) Z || _ WB V ;
define fixZ         Z -> z ;

# 'ss' -> /s/
define SS           s s -> S ;
# define fixS       S -> s ;

# 'ç' -> /s/
define cedilleC     ç -> S ;

# 'x' -> /ks/ intervocalically
define intervocalX  x -> k s || V _ V ;

# 'x' -> /s/ before a consonant
define elsewhereX   x -> s || _ C ;

# 'x' -> /0/ word-finally
define finalX       x -> 0 || _ WB ;

# 'z' -> /∅/ word-finally
define finalZ       z -> 0 || _ WB ;

# 'ch' -> /ʃ/
define CH           c h -> ʃ ;

# 'tch' -> /t͡ʃ/
define TCH          t c h -> t͡ʃ ;

# 'j' -> /ʒ/
define J            j -> ʒ ;

# 'dj' -> /d͡ʒ/      
define DJ           d j -> d͡ʒ ;

# 'ts' -> /t͡s/
define TS           t s -> t͡s ;

# 'dz' -> /d͡z/
define DZ           d z -> d͡z ;

# 'r' -> /ʁ/ elsewhere
define uvularR      r -> ʁ ;

# 'r' -> /∅/ word-finally
define finalR       r (->) 0 || _ WB ;

# 'rr' -> /ʁ/
define RR           r r -> ʁ ;

# 'h' -> /∅/
define silentH      h -> 0 ;

# 'll' -> /l/
define LL           l l -> l ;

# 'ill' -> /ʎ/
define ILL          i l l -> iʎ || [C | WB] _ ;

# 'cll' -> /kʎ/
define CLL          c l l -> kʎ ;

# 'gll' -> /gʎ/
define GLL          g l l -> gʎ ;

# 'fll' -> /fʎ/
define FLL          f l l -> fʎ ;

# 'oill' -> /oʎ/
define OILL         o i l l -> oʎ ;

# 'y' -> /j/
define regY         y -> j ;

# -------------- VOWELS --------------

# 'i' -> /j/ before a vowel
define prevowelI    i -> j || _ V ;

# 'ì' -> /i/ 
define graveI       ì -> i ;

# 'u' -> /y/ elsewhere
define regU         u -> y ;

# 'ou' -> /w/ before a vowel
define prevowelOU   o u -> w || _ V ;

# 'ou' -> /u/ elsewhere
define OU           o u -> U ;
define fixU         U -> u ;

# 'hu' -> /w/ before a vowel
define HU           h u -> w || WB _ V ;

# 'e' -> /ɛ/ 
define regE         e -> ɛ || _ C [ C | WB ] ;

# 'ʁe' -> /ʁɛ/
define RE           ʁ e -> ʁ ɛ ;

# 'é' -> /e/ 
define aiguE        é -> E ;
define graveE       è -> e ;

# 'ei' -> /ej/
define EI           e i -> e j ;

# 'eu' -> /ø/
define EU           e u -> ø ;

# 'oe' -> /ø/
define OE           o e -> ø ;

# 'oi' -> /wa/
define OI           o i -> w a ;

# 'au' -> /o/
define AU           a u -> o ;

# 'ai' -> /aj/
define AI           a i -> a j ;

# 'à' -> /a/
define graveA       à -> a ;

# 'â' -> /a/
define circA        â -> a ;

# 'ä' -> /a/
define umlautA      ä -> a ;


# 'in' -> /ɛ̃/
define IN           i n -> ɛ̃ ;

# 'un' -> /ø̃/
define UN           u n -> ø̃ ;

# 'en' -> /ɛ̃/
define EN           e n -> ɛ̃ ;

# 'eun' -> /ø̃/
define EUN          e u n -> ø̃ ;

# 'oen' -> /wɛ̃/
define OEN          o e n -> w ɛ̃ ;

# 'on' -> /õ/
define ON           o n -> õ ;

# 'an' -> /ã/
define AN           a n -> ã ;

# 'ain' -> /ɛ̃/
define AIN          a i n -> ɛ̃ ;

# -------------- MORPHEMES? --------------

# 'vont' -> /ʋõ/ word-finally
define VONT         v o n t -> ʋ õ || _ WB ;

# 'ave' -> /a/ word-finally SOMETIMES
define AVE          v e (->) 0 || a _ WB ;

# 'ave' -> /avɛ/ OTHERWISE
define AVE2         e -> ɛ || a v _ WB ;

# 's' -> /ʒ/ in the verb root pous-
define POUS         s -> ʒ || WB p o u _ ;

# 't' -> /∅/ word-finally SOMETIMES
define finalT       t (->) 0 || _ WB ;

# 'o' -> /∅/ in -TRO 
define TRO          o -> ə || t r _ WB ;

# 'tel' -> /ti/ word-finally
define TEL          t e l -> t i || _ WB ;

# 'et' -> /ɛt/ word-finally
define ET           e t -> ɛ T || _ WB ;
define fixT         T -> tː ;

# -------------- G2P --------------

define ExMap [ a v e i r -> "EX_aveir" || WB _ WB .o. h i v e r -> "EX_hiver" || WB _ WB .o. p e r -> "EX_per" || WB _ WB .o. t e t e s -> "EX_tetes" || WB _ WB .o. c o u t e ́ -> "EX_couté" || WB _ WB .o. p e i l l o s -> "EX_peillos" || WB _ WB .o. c o u p s -> "EX_coups" || WB _ WB .o. p r e m i e r e -> "EX_premiere" || WB _ WB .o. s u -> "EX_su" || WB _ WB .o. d e n t s -> "EX_dents" || WB _ WB .o. d z e n s -> "EX_dzens" || WB _ WB .o. s o p a t a ̂ -> "EX_sopatâ" || WB _ WB .o. e s t -> "EX_est" || WB _ WB .o. e t -> "EX_et" || WB _ WB .o. t s a m o s -> "EX_tsamos" || WB _ WB .o. t r e i s -> "EX_treis" || WB _ WB .o. c h o u e ́ s -> "EX_choués" || WB _ WB .o. d i e s -> "EX_dies" || WB _ WB .o. v i n g t -> "EX_vingt" || WB _ WB .o. t r e n t a -> "EX_trenta" || WB _ WB .o. q u a r e n t a -> "EX_quarenta" || WB _ WB .o. c i n q u a n t a -> "EX_cinquanta" || WB _ WB .o. c h o u e s s a n t a -> "EX_chouessanta" || WB _ WB .o. s e t a n t a -> "EX_setanta" || WB _ WB .o. h u i t a n t a -> "EX_huitanta" || WB _ WB .o. n o n a n t a -> "EX_nonanta" || WB _ WB .o. m o u s t r o -> "EX_moustro" || WB _ WB .o. p o u e r e -> "EX_pouere" || WB _ WB .o. t e t a -> "EX_teta" || WB _ WB .o. f r é r e -> "EX_frére" || WB _ WB .o. b r a s -> "EX_bras" || WB _ WB .o. s o v e n t -> "EX_sovent" || WB _ WB .o. t r a c a s -> "EX_tracas" || WB _ WB ] ;
define ExFix [ "EX_aveir" -> a v e j || WB _ WB .o. "EX_hiver" -> i v i ʁ || WB _ WB .o. "EX_per" -> p ə || WB _ WB .o. "EX_tetes" -> t i t ə || WB _ WB .o. "EX_couté" -> k u t i || WB _ WB .o. "EX_peillos" -> p i d j o || WB _ WB .o. "EX_coups" -> k u || WB _ WB .o. "EX_premiere" -> p ʁ ə m i || WB _ WB .o. "EX_su" -> ʃ y || WB _ WB .o. "EX_dents" -> d i || WB _ WB .o. "EX_dzens" -> d ͡ z i || WB _ WB .o. "EX_sopatâ" -> ʃ o p a t a || WB _ WB .o. "EX_est" -> ɛ || WB _ WB .o. "EX_et" -> e || WB _ WB .o. "EX_tsamos" -> t s a m o ʃ || WB _ WB .o. "EX_treis" -> t r i || WB _ WB .o. "EX_choués" -> ʃ w i || WB _ WB .o. "EX_dies" -> d j ə || WB _ WB .o. "EX_vingt" -> v ø ̃ t || WB _ WB .o. "EX_trenta" -> t ʁ ɛ n t a || WB _ WB .o. "EX_quarenta" -> k a ʁ ɛ n t a || WB _ WB .o. "EX_cinquanta" -> s ə n k a n t a || WB _ WB .o. "EX_chouessanta" -> ʃ u s a n t a || WB _ WB .o. "EX_setanta" -> s t a n t a || WB _ WB .o. "EX_huitanta" -> w i t a n t a || WB _ WB .o. "EX_nonanta" -> n o n a n t a || WB _ WB .o. "EX_moustro" -> m u ʃ t r ə || WB _ WB .o. "EX_pouere" -> p w i || WB _ WB .o. "EX_teta" -> t i t a || WB _ WB .o. "EX_frére" -> f ʁ i || WB _ WB .o. "EX_bras" -> b ʁ e || WB _ WB .o. "EX_sovent" -> s o v ɛ n || WB _ WB .o. "EX_tracas" -> t r a k a s || WB _ WB ] ;

define G2P ExMap .o. TCH .o. DZ .o. DJ .o. TRO .o. VONT .o. AVE .o. AVE2 .o. POUS .o. 
    CC .o. VV .o. TT .o. PP .o. BB .o. MM .o. 
    CLL .o. GLL .o. FLL .o. OILL .o. ILL .o.
    GN .o. GU .o. QU .o. HU .o.
    DJ .o. J .o. regY .o. finalR .o. RR .o. uvularR .o. 
    SS .o. CI .o. softC .o. liaisonS .o. finalS .o. TS .o. 
    CH .o. LL .o.
    prevowelOU .o. OU .o. EI .o. OI .o.
    finalNG .o. regNG .o. NQ .o. 
    intervocalN .o. NN .o. EUN .o. UN .o. AIN .o. IN .o. AN .o. ON .o. OEN .o. EN .o. fixN .o.
    EU .o. OE .o. 
    intervocalX .o. elsewhereX .o. finalX .o.
    softG .o. hardC .o.
    TEL .o. ET .o. finalT .o. fixT .o. finalZ .o. fixZ .o.
    cedilleC .o. silentH .o.
    circA .o. umlautA .o.
    aiguE .o. graveA .o. graveE .o. graveI .o.
    regU .o. fixU .o. prevowelI .o. 
    AU .o. AI .o.
    regE .o. RE .o. 
    ExFix;

regex G2P;
